dictionaries/isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX GC Y 80
SFX GC ti l .
SFX GC ti la .
SFX GC ti lo .
SFX GC ti li .
SFX GC skakati u .
SFX GC skakati em .
SFX GC skakati eš .
SFX GC skakati e .
SFX GC skakati emo .
SFX GC skakati ete .
SFX GC skakati ut .
SFX GC ti h .
SFX GC ti še .
SFX GC ti hmo .
SFX GC ti ste .
SFX GC ti hu .
SFX GC skakati j .
SFX GC skakati jmo .
SFX GC skakati jte .
SFX GC skakati juči .
SFX GC skakati jučego .
SFX GC skakati jučemu .
SFX GC skakati jučim .
SFX GC skakati jučem .
SFX GC skakati jučih .
SFX GC skakati jučimi .
SFX GC skakati juča .
SFX GC skakati juču .
SFX GC skakati jučej .
SFX GC skakati jučeju .
SFX GC skakati juče .
SFX GC skakati emy .
SFX GC skakati emogo .
SFX GC skakati emomu .
SFX GC skakati emym .
SFX GC skakati emom .
SFX GC skakati emo .
SFX GC skakati ema .
SFX GC skakati emu .
SFX GC skakati emoj .
SFX GC skakati emoju .
SFX GC skakati emi .
SFX GC skakati eme .
SFX GC skakati emyh .
SFX GC skakati emym .
SFX GC skakati emymi .
SFX GC ti vši .
SFX GC ti všego .
SFX GC ti všemu .
SFX GC ti všim .
SFX GC ti všem .
SFX GC ti vših .
SFX GC ti všimi .
SFX GC ti vša .
SFX GC ti všu .
SFX GC ti všej .
SFX GC ti všeju .
SFX GC ti vše .
SFX GC ti ny .
SFX GC ti nogo .
SFX GC ti nomu .
SFX GC ti nym .
SFX GC ti nom .
SFX GC ti ni .
SFX GC ti ne .
SFX GC ti nyh .
SFX GC ti nymi .
SFX GC ti na .
SFX GC ti nu .
SFX GC ti noj .
SFX GC ti noju .
SFX GC ti no .
SFX GC ti nje/xPxE .
SFX GC ti nja/xPxE .
SFX GC ti nju/xPxE .
SFX GC ti njem/xPxE .
SFX GC ti nij/xPxE .
SFX GC ti njam/xPxE .
SFX GC ti njami/xPxE .
SFX GC ti njah/xPxE .
